incubator/apertium-ell-eng/apertium-ell-eng.ell.dix
    <pardef n="σ/υζητώ__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>υζήτησα</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητούσα</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητήσαμε</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητούσαμε</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητάγαμε</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητήσατε</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητούσατε</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητήθηκε</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζήτησε</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητιόταν</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητείτο</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητούσε</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητήσε</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζήτησαν</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητήθηκαν</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητιόνταν</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητούνταν</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζήταγαν</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ηζητήθηκαν</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητούντο</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητούσαν</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζήτηθηκαν</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητήσει</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητηθεί</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητήσω</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητήσουμε</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητήσεις</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητήσετε</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητήσει</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητηθεί</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητήσουν</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητηθούν</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητώ</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητάω</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητάμε</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητούμε</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ηζητάμε</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ηζυτάμε</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητησούμε</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ηζητούμε</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητάς</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητάτε</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητείστε</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητείτε</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητείται</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητά</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητάται</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητάει</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητιέται</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητεί</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητούν</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητούνται</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητώνται</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητάνε</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητιούνται</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητιώνται</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υζητώντας</l><r>υζητώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>



  </pardefs>

<e lm="συζητώ" a="grguest"><i>σ</i><par n="σ/υζητώ__vblex"/></e>
